Illinois, session 104th, SB2994.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Genetic Information Privacy Act is amended 5by changing Sections 5, 10, 20, 25, 40, and 50 and by adding 6Section 27 as follows: 7    (410 ILCS 513/5)8    Sec. 5. Legislative findings; intent. The General Assembly 9finds that: 10    (a)(1) The use of genetic testing can be valuable to an 11individual. 12    (2) Despite existing laws, regulations, and professional 13standards which require or promote voluntary and confidential 14use of genetic testing information, many members of the public 15are deterred from seeking genetic testing because of fear that 16test results will be disclosed without consent in a manner not 17permitted by law or will be used in a discriminatory manner. 18    (3) The public health will be served by facilitating 19voluntary and confidential nondiscriminatory use of genetic 20testing information.21    (4) The use of electronic health record systems and the 22exchange of patient records, both paper and electronic, 23through secure means, including through secure health   SB2994- 2 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1information exchanges, should be encouraged to improve patient 2health care and care coordination, facilitate public health 3reporting, and control health care costs, among other 4purposes.5    (5) Limiting the use or disclosure of, and requests for, 6protected health information to the minimum necessary to 7accomplish an intended purpose, when being transmitted by or 8on behalf of a covered entity under HIPAA, is a key component 9of health information privacy. The disclosure of genetic 10information, when allowed by this Act, shall be performed in 11accordance with the minimum necessary standard when required 12under HIPAA.13    (b)(1) Ongoing advances in technology have produced 14exponential growth in the volume and variety of personal data 15being generated, collected, stored, and analyzed, and these 16advances present both great promise and potential risks.17    (2) Technology that collects data about the user's bodily 18and mental functions is transforming the volume and 19sensitivity of personal data collected from individuals and 20stored by companies.21    (3) Neurotechnologies, including devices capable of 22recording, interpreting, and altering the response of an 23individual's central or peripheral nervous system to its 24internal or external environment, raise particularly pressing 25privacy concerns given their ability to monitor, decode, and 26manipulate brain activity.  SB2994- 3 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1    (4) Data concerning the activity of the human brain and 2wider nervous systems, or "neurotechnology data", is extremely 3sensitive and can reveal intimate information about 4individuals, including information about health, mental 5states, emotions, and cognitive functioning.6    (5) Each human brain is unique, meaning that neural data 7is specific to the individual from whom it is collected. 8Because neurotechnology data contains distinctive information 9about the structure and functioning of individual brains and 10nervous systems, it contains sensitive information that may 11link the data to an identified or identifiable individual.12    (6) The collection of neurotechnology data involves the 13involuntary disclosure of information. Even if individuals 14consent to the collection and processing of their data for 15narrow use, they are unlikely to be fully aware of the content 16or quality of information they are sharing.17    (7) Neurotechnology users cannot decide what specific 18neurotechnology information they would like to disclose, and 19they are unlikely to understand the extent to which their 20neurotechnology data can be decoded, currently or in the 21future. Neurotechnologies can collect and process information 22about an individual that the individual did not even know 23existed.24    (8) Neurotechnologies that are deployed in medical 25settings or otherwise utilize the surgical implantation of 26invasive devices are typically regulated as medical tools that   SB2994- 4 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1produce health information. Both invasive and noninvasive 2wearable neurotechnologies used in medical settings are also 3regulated by health data privacy laws. However, when 4noninvasive neurotechnologies are used outside of medical 5settings, they are generally considered consumer products and 6operate without regulation or data protection standards. 7(Source: P.A. 98-1046, eff. 1-1-15.) 8    (410 ILCS 513/10)9    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Business associate" has the meaning ascribed to it under 11HIPAA, as specified in 45 CFR 160.103.12    "Covered entity" has the meaning ascribed to it under 13HIPAA, as specified in 45 CFR 160.103.14    "De-identified information" means health information that 15is not individually identifiable as described under HIPAA, as 16specified in 45 CFR 164.514(b). 17    "Disclosure" has the meaning ascribed to it under HIPAA, 18as specified in 45 CFR 160.103. 19    "Employer" means the State of Illinois, any unit of local 20government, and any board, commission, department, 21institution, or school district, any party to a public 22contract, any joint apprenticeship or training committee 23within the State, and every other person employing employees 24within the State.25    "Employment agency" means both public and private   SB2994- 5 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1employment agencies and any person, labor organization, or 2labor union having a hiring hall or hiring office regularly 3undertaking, with or without compensation, to procure 4opportunities to work, or to procure, recruit, refer, or place 5employees.6    "Family member" means, with respect to an individual, (i) 7the spouse of the individual; (ii) a dependent child of the 8individual, including a child who is born to or placed for 9adoption with the individual; (iii) any other person 10qualifying as a covered dependent under a managed care plan; 11and (iv) all other individuals related by blood or law to the 12individual or the spouse or child described in subsections (i) 13through (iii) of this definition.14    "Genetic information" has the meaning ascribed to it under 15HIPAA, as specified in 45 CFR 160.103.16    "Genetic monitoring" means the periodic examination of 17employees to evaluate acquired modifications to their genetic 18material, such as chromosomal damage or evidence of increased 19occurrence of mutations that may have developed in the course 20of employment due to exposure to toxic substances in the 21workplace in order to identify, evaluate, and respond to 22effects of or control adverse environmental exposures in the 23workplace.24    "Genetic services" has the meaning ascribed to it under 25HIPAA, as specified in 45 CFR 160.103. 26    "Genetic testing" and "genetic test" have the meaning   SB2994- 6 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1ascribed to "genetic test" under HIPAA, as specified in 45 CFR 2160.103. "Genetic testing" includes direct-to-consumer 3commercial genetic testing. 4    "Health care operations" has the meaning ascribed to it 5under HIPAA, as specified in 45 CFR 164.501.6    "Health care professional" means (i) a licensed physician, 7(ii) a licensed physician assistant, (iii) a licensed advanced 8practice registered nurse, (iv) a licensed dentist, (v) a 9licensed podiatric physician, (vi) a licensed genetic 10counselor, or (vii) an individual certified to provide genetic 11testing by a state or local public health department.12    "Health care provider" has the meaning ascribed to it 13under HIPAA, as specified in 45 CFR 160.103.14    "Health facility" means a hospital, blood bank, blood 15center, sperm bank, or other health care institution, 16including any "health facility" as that term is defined in the 17Illinois Finance Authority Act.18    "Health information exchange" or "HIE" means a health 19information exchange or health information organization that 20exchanges health information electronically. In certain 21circumstances, in accordance with HIPAA, an HIE will be a 22business associate.23    "Health oversight agency" has the meaning ascribed to it 24under HIPAA, as specified in 45 CFR 164.501.25    "HIPAA" means the Health Insurance Portability and 26Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, as amended by   SB2994- 7 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical 2Health Act of 2009, Public Law 111-05, and any subsequent 3amendments thereto and any regulations promulgated thereunder. 4    "Insurer" means (i) an entity that is subject to the 5jurisdiction of the Director of Insurance and (ii) a managed 6care plan.7    "Labor organization" includes any organization, labor 8union, craft union, or any voluntary unincorporated 9association designed to further the cause of the rights of 10union labor that is constituted for the purpose, in whole or in 11part, of collective bargaining or of dealing with employers 12concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or 13apprenticeships or applications for apprenticeships, or of 14other mutual aid or protection in connection with employment, 15including apprenticeships or applications for apprenticeships. 16    "Licensing agency" means a board, commission, committee, 17council, department, or officers, except a judicial officer, 18in this State or any political subdivision authorized to 19grant, deny, renew, revoke, suspend, annul, withdraw, or amend 20a license or certificate of registration.21    "Limited data set" has the meaning ascribed to it under 22HIPAA, as described in 45 CFR 164.514(e)(2). 23    "Managed care plan" means a plan that establishes, 24operates, or maintains a network of health care providers that 25have entered into agreements with the plan to provide health 26care services to enrollees where the plan has the ultimate and   SB2994- 8 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1direct contractual obligation to the enrollee to arrange for 2the provision of or pay for services through:3        (1) organizational arrangements for ongoing quality 4    assurance, utilization review programs, or dispute 5    resolution; or6        (2) financial incentives for persons enrolled in the 7    plan to use the participating providers and procedures 8    covered by the plan.9    A managed care plan may be established or operated by any 10entity including a licensed insurance company, hospital or 11medical service plan, health maintenance organization, limited 12health service organization, preferred provider organization, 13third party administrator, or an employer or employee 14organization.15    "Minimum necessary" means HIPAA's standard for using, 16disclosing, and requesting protected health information found 17in 45 CFR 164.502(b) and 164.514(d).18    "Neurotechnology" means devices capable of recording, 19interpreting, or altering the response of an individual's 20central or peripheral nervous system to its internal or 21external environment. "Neurotechnology" includes mental 22augmentation or improving human cognition and behavior through 23direct recording or manipulation of neural activity by 24neurotechnology.25    "Neurotechnology data" means information that is captured 26by neurotechnologies, that is generated by measuring the   SB2994- 9 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1activity of an individual's central or peripheral nervous 2systems, or that is data associated with neural activity, the 3activity of neurons or glial cells in the central or 4peripheral nervous system. "Neurotechnology data" does not 5include nonneural information, such as pupil dilation, motor 6activity, breathing rate, or other information about the 7downstream physical effects of neural activity. 8    "Nontherapeutic purpose" means a purpose that is not 9intended to improve or preserve the life or health of the 10individual whom the information concerns.11    "Organized health care arrangement" has the meaning 12ascribed to it under HIPAA, as specified in 45 CFR 160.103.13    "Patient safety activities" has the meaning ascribed to it 14under 42 CFR 3.20.15    "Payment" has the meaning ascribed to it under HIPAA, as 16specified in 45 CFR 164.501.17    "Person" includes any natural person, partnership, 18association, joint venture, trust, governmental entity, public 19or private corporation, health facility, or other legal 20entity.21    "Protected health information" has the meaning ascribed to 22it under HIPAA, as specified in 45 CFR 164.103.23    "Research" has the meaning ascribed to it under HIPAA, as 24specified in 45 CFR 164.501.25    "State agency" means an instrumentality of the State of 26Illinois and any instrumentality of another state which   SB2994- 10 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1pursuant to applicable law or a written undertaking with an 2instrumentality of the State of Illinois is bound to protect 3the privacy of genetic information of Illinois persons.4    "Treatment" has the meaning ascribed to it under HIPAA, as 5specified in 45 CFR 164.501. 6    "Use" has the meaning ascribed to it under HIPAA, as 7specified in 45 CFR 160.103, where context dictates. 8(Source: P.A. 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 9    (410 ILCS 513/20)10    Sec. 20. Use of genetic testing information or 11neurotechnology data for insurance purposes. 12    (a) An insurer may not seek information derived from 13genetic testing or neurotechnology data for use in connection 14with a policy of accident and health insurance. Except as 15provided in subsection (c), an insurer that receives 16information derived from genetic testing or neurotechnology 17data, regardless of the source of that information, may not 18use the information for a nontherapeutic purpose as it relates 19to a policy of accident and health insurance.20    (b) An insurer shall not use or disclose protected health 21information that is genetic information or neurotechnology 22data for underwriting purposes. For purposes of this Section, 23"underwriting purposes" means, with respect to an insurer: 24        (1) rules for, or determination of, eligibility 25    (including enrollment and continued eligibility) for, or   SB2994- 11 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1    determination of, benefits under the plan, coverage, or 2    policy (including changes in deductibles or other 3    cost-sharing mechanisms in return for activities such as 4    completing a health risk assessment or participating in a 5    wellness program);6        (2) the computation of premium or contribution amounts 7    under the plan, coverage, or policy (including discounts, 8    rebates, payments in kind, or other premium differential 9    mechanisms in return for activities, such as completing a 10    health risk assessment or participating in a wellness 11    program);12        (3) the application of any pre-existing condition 13    exclusion under the plan, coverage, or policy; and14        (4) other activities related to the creation, renewal, 15    or replacement of a contract of health insurance or health 16    benefits. 17    "Underwriting purposes" does not include determinations of 18medical appropriateness where an individual seeks a benefit 19under the plan, coverage, or policy.20    This subsection (b) does not apply to insurers that are 21issuing a long-term care policy, excluding a nursing home 22fixed indemnity plan. 23    (c) An insurer may consider the results of genetic testing 24or may consider neurotechnology data in connection with a 25policy of accident and health insurance if the individual 26voluntarily submits the results of genetic testing or   SB2994- 12 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1voluntarily submits neurotechnology data and if the results of 2genetic testing or the neurotechnology data are favorable to 3the individual.4    (d) An insurer that possesses information derived from 5genetic testing or from neurotechnology data may not release 6the information to a third party, except as specified in this 7Act.8    (e) A company providing direct-to-consumer commercial 9genetic testing or providing direct-to-consumer 10neurotechnology data is prohibited from sharing any genetic 11test information, neurotechnology data, or other personally 12identifiable information about a consumer with any health or 13life insurance company without written consent from the 14consumer. 15(Source: P.A. 101-132, eff. 1-1-20.) 16    (410 ILCS 513/25)17    Sec. 25. Use of genetic testing information or 18neurotechnology data by employers. 19    (a) An employer, employment agency, labor organization, 20and licensing agency shall treat genetic testing and genetic 21information in such a manner that is consistent with the 22requirements of federal law, including but not limited to the 23Genetic Information Nondiscrimination Act of 2008, the 24Americans with Disabilities Act, Title VII of the Civil Rights 25Act of 1964, the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, the   SB2994- 13 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, the Federal Mine 2Safety and Health Act of 1977, or the Atomic Energy Act of 31954. 4    (b) An employer may release genetic testing information or 5neurotechnology data only in accordance with this Act.6    (c) An employer, employment agency, labor organization, 7and licensing agency shall not directly or indirectly do any 8of the following:9        (1) solicit, request, require or purchase genetic 10    testing or genetic information of a person or a family 11    member of the person, or administer a genetic test to a 12    person or a family member of the person as a condition of 13    employment, preemployment application, labor organization 14    membership, or licensure;15        (2) solicit, request, require, or purchase 16    neurotechnology data of a person or a family member of a 17    person, or require the person or family member of the 18    person to use a neurotechnology, as a condition of 19    employment, preemployment application, labor organization 20    membership, or licensure; 21        (3) (2) affect the terms, conditions, or privileges of 22    employment, preemployment application, labor organization 23    membership, or licensure, or terminate the employment, 24    labor organization membership, or licensure of any person 25    because of genetic testing, or genetic information, or 26    neurotechnology data with respect to the employee or   SB2994- 14 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1    family member, or information about a request for or the 2    receipt of genetic testing or neurotechnology data by such 3    employee or family member of such employee;4        (4) (3) limit, segregate, or classify employees in any 5    way that would deprive or tend to deprive any employee of 6    employment opportunities or otherwise adversely affect the 7    status of the employee as an employee because of genetic 8    testing, or genetic information, or neurotechnology data 9    with respect to the employee or a family member, or 10    information about a request for or the receipt of genetic 11    testing, or genetic information, or neurotechnology data 12    by such employee or family member of such employee; and13        (5) (4) retaliate through discharge or in any other 14    manner against any person alleging a violation of this Act 15    or participating in any manner in a proceeding under this 16    Act.17    (d) An agreement between a person and an employer, 18prospective employer, employment agency, labor organization, 19or licensing agency, or its employees, agents, or members 20offering the person employment, labor organization membership, 21licensure, or any pay or benefit in return for taking a genetic 22test or using a neurotechnology is prohibited.23    (e) An employer shall not use genetic information, or 24genetic testing, or neurotechnology data in furtherance of a 25workplace wellness program benefiting employees unless (1) 26health services, or genetic services, or neurotechnology   SB2994- 15 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1services are offered by the employer, (2) the employee 2provides written authorization in accordance with Section 27 3or 30 of this Act, as it may apply, (3) only the employee or 4family member if the family member is receiving genetic 5neurotechnology data services and the licensed health care 6professional or licensed genetic counselor involved in 7providing such services receive individually identifiable 8information concerning the results of such services, and (4) 9any individually identifiable information is only available 10for purposes of such services and shall not be disclosed to the 11employer except in aggregate terms that do not disclose the 12identity of specific employees. An employer shall not penalize 13an employee who does not disclose his or her genetic 14information or neurotechnology data or does not choose to 15participate in a program requiring disclosure of the 16employee's genetic information or neurotechnology data. 17    (f) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit 18genetic testing of an employee who requests a genetic test and 19who provides written authorization, in accordance with Section 2030 of this Act, from taking a genetic test for the purpose of 21initiating a workers' compensation claim under the Workers' 22Compensation Act.23    (g) A purchase of commercially and publicly available 24documents, including newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and 25books but not including medical databases, or court records, 26or consumer neurotechnology databases or inadvertently   SB2994- 16 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1requesting family medical history by an employer, employment 2agency, labor organization, and licensing agency does not 3violate this Act.4    (h) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit an 5employer that conducts DNA analysis for law enforcement 6purposes as a forensic laboratory and that includes such 7analysis in the Combined DNA Index System pursuant to the 8federal Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994 9from requesting or requiring genetic testing or genetic 10information of such employer's employees, but only to the 11extent that such genetic testing or genetic information is 12used for analysis of DNA identification markers for quality 13control to detect sample contamination.14    (i) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit an 15employer from requesting or requiring genetic information or 16neurotechnology data to be used for genetic monitoring or 17other monitoring of the biological effects of toxic substances 18in the workplace, but only if (1) the employer provides 19written notice of the genetic monitoring or other monitoring 20to the employee; (2) the employee provides written 21authorization under Section 27 or 30 of this Act, as it may 22apply, or the genetic monitoring or other monitoring is 23required by federal or State law; (3) the employee is informed 24of individual monitoring results; (4) the monitoring is in 25compliance with any federal genetic monitoring regulations or 26State genetic monitoring regulations regarding genetic   SB2994- 17 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1monitoring or other monitoring under the authority of the 2federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970; and (5) 3the employer, excluding any health care provider, health care 4professional, or health facility that is involved in the 5genetic monitoring or other monitoring program, receives the 6results of the monitoring only in aggregate terms that do not 7disclose the identity of specific employees.8    (j) Despite lawful acquisition of genetic testing, or 9genetic information, or neurotechnology data under subsections 10(e) through (i) of this Section, an employer, employment 11agency, labor organization, and licensing agency still may not 12use or disclose the genetic test, or genetic information, or 13neurotechnology data in violation of this Act.14    (k) Except as provided in subsections (e), (f), (h), and 15(i) of this Section, a person shall not knowingly sell to or 16interpret for an employer, employment agency, labor 17organization, or licensing agency, or its employees, agents, 18or members, a genetic test or neurotechnology data of an 19employee, labor organization member, or license holder, or of 20a prospective employee, member, or license holder. 21(Source: P.A. 100-396, eff. 1-1-18.) 22    (410 ILCS 513/27 new)23    Sec. 27. Confidentiality of neurotechnology data.24    (a) As used in this Section:25    "Entity" means a partnership, corporation, association, or   SB2994- 18 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1public or private organization of any character that:2        (1) offers consumer neurotechnology products or 3    services directly to a consumer; or4        (2) collects, uses, or analyzes neurotechnology data.5    "Government agency" means a State agency as defined under 6Section 1-7 of the Illinois State Auditing Act, a unit of local 7government, a school district, or any administrative unit or 8corporate outgrowth thereof.9    "Processor" means a person that processes genetic data on 10behalf of an entity pursuant to a contract between the entity 11and the processor that prohibits the processor from retaining, 12using, or disclosing the neurotechnology data, or any 13information regarding the identity of the consumer, including 14whether that consumer has solicited or received 15neurotechnology, as applicable, for any purpose other than for 16the specific purpose of performing the services specified in 17the contract.18    "Third party" means a person other than the consumer, 19entity, or processor.20    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, 21neurotechnology data and information derived from 22neurotechnology data is confidential and privileged and may be 23released only to the individual whose activity is measured or 24captured and to persons specifically authorized, in writing in 25accordance with this Section, by that individual to receive 26the information.  SB2994- 19 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1    (c) To safeguard the privacy, confidentiality, security, 2and integrity of an individual's neurotechnology data, an 3entity shall:4        (1) provide clear and complete information regarding 5    the entity's policies and procedures for the collection, 6    use, or disclosure of neurotechnology data by making 7    available to a consumer:8            (A) a high-level privacy policy overview that 9        includes basic, essential information about the 10        entity's collection, use, or disclosure of 11        neurotechnology data; and12            (B) a prominent, publicly available privacy notice 13        that includes, at a minimum, information about the 14        entity's data collection, consent, use, access, 15        disclosure, transfer, security, and retention and 16        deletion practices for neurotechnology data;17        (2) obtain initial express consent from a consumer, 18    parent, guardian, or power of attorney for the collection, 19    use, or disclosure of the consumer's neurotechnology data 20    that:21            (A) clearly describes the entity's use of the 22        neurotechnology data that the entity collects through 23        the entity's neurotechnology product or service;24            (B) specifies the categories of individuals within 25        the entity that have access to neurotechnology data; 26        and  SB2994- 20 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1            (C) specifies how the entity may share the 2        neurotechnology data;3        (3) if the entity engages in any of the following, 4    obtain a consumer's:5            (A) separate express consent for:6                (i) the transfer or disclosure of the 7            consumer's neurotechnology data to any third party 8            other than the entity's processors, including the 9            name of the third party to which the consumer's 10            neurotechnology data will be transferred or 11            disclosed with the consumer's express consent;12                (ii) the use of neurotechnology data beyond 13            the primary purpose of the entity's 14            neurotechnology product or service and inherent 15            contextual uses; or16                (iii) the entity's retention of any 17            neurotechnology data provided by the consumer 18            following the entity's completion of the primary 19            purpose of the entity's neurotechnology requested 20            by the consumer;21            (B) informed express consent for transfer or 22        disclosure of the consumer's neurotechnology data to 23        third party persons for:24                (i) research purposes; or25                (ii) research conducted under the control of 26            the entity for the purpose of publication or   SB2994- 21 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1            generalizable knowledge; and2            (C) express consent for:3                (i) marketing to a consumer based on the 4            consumer's neurotechnology data;5                (ii) marketing by a third-party person to a 6            consumer based on the consumer having ordered or 7            purchased a neurotechnology product or service, 8            except that marketing under this subdivision (ii) 9            does not include the provision of customized 10            content or offers on the websites or through the 11            applications or services provided by the entity 12            with the first-party relationship to the consumer; 13            or14                (iii) sale or other valuable consideration of 15            the consumer's neurotechnology data.16        (4) comply with the provisions of subsection (d) 17    requiring a valid legal process for disclosing 18    neurotechnology data to law enforcement or any other 19    government agency without a consumer's express consent;20        (5) develop, implement, and maintain a comprehensive 21    security program to protect a consumer's neurotechnology 22    data against unauthorized access, use, or disclosure; and23        (6) provide a process for a consumer to:24            (A) access the consumer's neurotechnology data;25            (B) request and obtain the destruction of the 26        consumer's neurotechnology data; and  SB2994- 22 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1            (C) revoke any consent provided by the consumer.2    (c-5) The requirements of paragraph (6) of subsection (c) 3shall be waived if:4        (1) the entity obtains express and informed written 5    consent from a consumer, parent, guardian, or power of 6    attorney for participation in a clinical research trial, 7    including the collection and use of any neurotechnology 8    data, which at a minimum must:9            (A) be in accordance with the good clinical 10        practice guideline issued by the international council 11        for harmonization of technical requirements for 12        pharmaceuticals for human use;13            (B) be obtained no sooner than 14 days from the 14        initial neurotechnology data collection if the data is 15        collected for a primary purpose unrelated to clinical 16        research;17            (C) be obtained separately from any other items of 18        consent;19            (D) be in writing on a form with text that is 20        easily readable with size 12-point type font or 21        larger;22            (E) include the entity's data retention, sharing, 23        and use policies; and24            (F) include notice that after consent is given, 25        there is no right to access, inspect, or require the 26        destruction of any neurotechnology data;  SB2994- 23 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1        (2) the neurotechnology data is used for clinical 2    research purposes only.3    (c-10) The requirements of subsection (c-5) supersede all 4exceptions to, and waivers of, informed consent in the federal 5policy for the protection of human subjects under 45 CFR Part 646, to the extent permitted by federal law. Neurotechnology 7data of Illinois residents collected in the State may not be 8stored within the territorial boundaries of any country 9currently sanctioned in any way by the United States office of 10foreign asset control or designated as a foreign adversary 11under 15 CFR 7.4(a). Neurotechnology data of Illinois 12residents collected in the State may only be transferred or 13stored outside the United States with the consent of the 14resident.15    (d) Neurotechnology data use by government agencies is 16regulated as follows:17        (1) Any collection, storage, use, or dissemination of 18    neurotechnology data by a government agency must be 19    performed in accordance with a specific State law or 20    executed through a search warrant or investigative 21    subpoena.22        (2) A government agency may not obtain neurotechnology 23    search results from a consumer neurotechnology database:24            (A) without a search warrant or investigative 25        subpoena issued by a court on a finding of probable 26        cause; or  SB2994- 24 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1            (B) unless the consumer whose information is 2        sought previously waived the consumer's right to 3        privacy in the information.4        (3) A government agency that legally obtains 5    neurotechnology database search results, as set forth in 6    paragraph (2) of subsection (d), or neurotechnology data, 7    as set forth in this Section, may use the results during 8    criminal investigations and judicial proceedings subject 9    to applicable rules of criminal procedure and evidence.10    (e) This Section does not apply to protected health 11information that is collected by a covered entity or business 12associate as those terms are defined in 45 CFR Parts 160 and 13164, if separate informed consent related to the collection, 14use, and dissemination of neurotechnology data is obtained 15from the consumer, parent, guardian, or power of attorney, and 16the covered entity or business associate follows the policies 17outlined in paragraph (6) of subsection (c). 18    (410 ILCS 513/40)19    Sec. 40. Right of action. 20    (a) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this Act shall 21have a right of action in a State circuit court or as a 22supplemental claim in a federal district court against an 23offending party. A prevailing party may recover for each 24violation: 25        (1) Against any party who negligently violates a   SB2994- 25 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1    provision of this Act, liquidated damages of $2,500 or 2    actual damages, whichever is greater. 3        (2) Against any party who intentionally or recklessly 4    violates a provision of this Act, liquidated damages of 5    $15,000 or actual damages, whichever is greater. 6        (3) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs, including 7    expert witness fees and other litigation expenses. 8        (4) Such other relief, including an injunction, as the 9    State or federal court may deem appropriate.10    (b) Article XL of the Illinois Insurance Code shall 11provide the exclusive remedy for violations of Section 30 by 12insurers.13    (c) Notwithstanding any provisions of the law to the 14contrary, any person alleging a violation of subsection (a) of 15Section 15, subsection (b) of Section 25, Section 27, Section 1630, Section 31, or Section 35 of this Act shall have a right of 17action in a State circuit court or as a supplemental claim in a 18federal district court to seek a preliminary injunction 19preventing the release or disclosure of genetic testing, or 20genetic information, or neurotechnology data pending the final 21resolution of any action under this Act. 22(Source: P.A. 98-1046, eff. 1-1-15.) 23    (410 ILCS 513/50)24    Sec. 50. Home rule. Any home rule unit of local 25government, any non-home rule municipality, or any non-home   SB2994- 26 -LRB104 17867 BDA 31303 b1rule county within the unincorporated territory of the county 2may enact ordinances, standards, rules, or regulations that 3protect genetic information, and genetic testing, and 4neurotechnology data in a manner or to an extent equal to or 5greater than the protection provided in this Act. This Section 6is a limitation on the concurrent exercise of home rule power 7under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 8Illinois Constitution.9(Source: P.A. 95-927, eff. 1-1-09.) 10    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 11severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 131, 2027.